Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 6. Enforcement Provisions.

Sec. 42.06.470.
Effect of regulations.

Regulations adopted by the commission under this chapter have the effect of law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.480.
Review and enforcement.

All final orders of the commission are subject to judicial review under AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

If an appeal is not taken from a final order of the commission within 10 calendar days, the commission may apply to the superior court for enforcement of this chapter, the regulations adopted under it, and the orders of the commission. The court shall enforce the order by injunction or other process.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 35 SLA 1977)

Secs. 42.06.490
— 42.06.500.
Complaint against pipeline carriers; adjudication.
[Repealed,
§ 20 ch 110 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 42.06.510.
[Renumbered as AS 42.06.445.]

Sec. 42.06.520.
[Renumbered as AS 42.06.607.]

Sec. 42.06.530.
Injunctions and monetary sanctions.

The full amount of damages determined by a civil action may be compromised by the commission. In determining the amount of the damages, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the gravity of the violation, and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of a violation, shall be considered. The amount of the damages, when finally determined, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, may be deducted from any sums owing by the state to the person charged or may be recovered in a civil action in the state courts.

A person may be enjoined by the superior court from committing a violation mentioned in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.540.
Civil penalties.

In addition to all other penalties and remedies provided by law, a person subject to the provisions of this chapter, as well as an officer, manager, agent, or employee of that person, that either violates or procures, aids, or abets the violation of any provision of this chapter, or of an order, regulation, or written requirement of the commission is subject to a maximum penalty of $500 for each violation.

A penalty may not be assessed unless the commission first issues an order to show cause why the penalty should not be levied. The order shall describe the violation with reasonable particularity and designate the maximum penalty that may be assessed for the violation. The order shall be served on the alleged violator named in the order. The order shall state a time and place for the hearing.

After a hearing the commission shall enter its findings of fact and final order which shall state when the penalties, if any, are payable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.550.
Each violation a separate offense.

Each violation of a provision of this chapter or of an order, decision, regulation, or written requirement of the commission is a separate and distinct offense and in case of a continuing violation each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.560.
Actions to recover damages and penalties; disposition.

Actions to recover damages and penalties under this chapter shall be brought by the attorney general in a court of competent jurisdiction.

All damages and penalties recovered under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the commission and deposited by it in the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.570.
Penalties cumulative.

All penalties imposed under this chapter are cumulative.

An action to recover a civil penalty is not a bar to an enforcement proceeding to require compliance, or to any other remedy provided by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.580.
Joinder of actions.

Under the applicable court rules, appeals from orders of the commission, applications for enforcement of commission orders and actions for recovery of damages or penalties may be joined.
The court may in the interests of justice separate the actions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.590.
Private cause of action.

A person subjected to an unlawful rate, price, service, or practice, in violation of this chapter, may sue in a state court of appropriate jurisdiction for damages resulting from the unlawful rate, price, service, or practice.

If the violation described in (a) of this section resulted in the overcharge of rate or price, the person paying the unlawful rate or price is entitled to recover as damages at least double the amount of the overcharge.

A person recovering damages under this section is entitled to a reasonable attorney fee, fixed by the court, to be taxed and collected as costs of the suit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)